Idaho, session 2026, H0623.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Chapter 16, Title 33, Idaho Code, be, and the same is
hereby amended by the addition thereto of a NEW SECTION, to be known and des-
ignated as Section 33-1639, Idaho Code, and to read as follows:
33-1639. MOMENT OF SILENCE IN PUBLIC SCHOOLS. (1) At or near the begin-
ning of each school day, in all grades and in all Idaho public schools, teach-
ers or school employees in charge of classrooms shall provide for a brief pe-
riod of silence for a minimum of sixty (60) seconds with the participation of
every pupil in the classroom. During such period, a student may, without in-
terfering with or distracting another student, reflect, meditate, pray, or
engage in another silent activity. During the period of silence, no other
activities shall take place.
(2) Teachers or school employees shall require all pupils to remain
silent and to make no distracting display so that each pupil may, in the ex-
ercise of the pupil's individual choice, reflect, meditate, pray, or engage
in any other silent activity that does not interfere with, distract from, or
impede other pupils' exercise of individual choice.
(3) Public school personnel are prohibited from providing instruction
to any student regarding the nature of any reflection that a student may en-
gage in during the period of silence, other than as provided in this section.
A public school shall provide notification to parents and legal guardians
including information on the period of silence provided in this section and
shall encourage parents and legal guardians to provide guidance to pupils
regarding such period.
SECTION 2. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2026.